Utah statutes.
34-38-14.   Employee not a person with a disability.

An employee or prospective employee whose drug or alcohol test result is confirmed as positive in accordance with this chapter may not, because of those results alone, be defined as a person with a disability for purposes of Title 34A, Chapter 5, Utah Antidiscrimination Act.

